Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4474.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 171.178, is amended to read: 171.178 REVOCATION, DENIAL, AND REINSTATEMENT; DRIVING WHILE IMPAIRED; CRIMINAL VEHICULAR HOMICIDE AND OPERATION. Subdivision 1. Definitions. (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text begin (b) "Alcohol-related violation" means any of the following: new text end new text begin (1) a refusal by a person to submit to a test of the person's breath, blood, or urine pursuant to section 169A.51, 169A.52, or 171.177 after a peace officer certified that there existed probable cause to believe the person had been driving, operating, or in physical control of a motor vehicle (i) while under the influence of alcohol, (ii) while under the influence of alcohol and another substance, or (iii) with an alcohol concentration that exceeds the limits established in chapter 169A; new text end new text begin (2) driving, operating, or being in physical control of a motor vehicle with an alcohol concentration that exceeds the limits established in chapter 169A as demonstrated by a test of the person's breath, blood, or urine performed pursuant to section 169A.51, 169A.52, or 171.177; or new text end new text begin (3) driving, operating, or being in physical control of a motor vehicle (i) while under the influence of alcohol, (ii) while under the influence of alcohol and another substance, or (iii) with an alcohol concentration that exceeds the limits established in chapter 169A as demonstrated by a conviction for violating section 169A.20. new text end deleted text begin (b)deleted text end new text begin (c)new text end "Ignition interlock device" has the meaning given in section 171.306, subdivision 1. deleted text begin (c)deleted text end new text begin (d)new text end "Qualified prior impaired driving incident" has the meaning given in section 169A.03, subdivision 22. new text begin (e) "Substance-related violation" means any of the following: new text end new text begin (1) a refusal by a person to submit to a test of the person's breath, blood, or urine pursuant to section 169A.51, 169A.52, or 171.177 after a peace officer certified that there existed probable cause to believe the person had been driving, operating, or in physical control of a motor vehicle: new text end new text begin (i) while under the influence of a controlled substance; new text end new text begin (ii) while under the influence of an intoxicating substance; new text end new text begin (iii) while under the influence of any combination of a controlled substance, an intoxicating substance, and alcohol; new text end new text begin (iv) while the person's body contained any amount of a controlled substance listed in Schedule I or II, or its metabolite; or new text end new text begin (v) while under the influence of cannabis flower, a cannabis product, a lower-potency hemp edible, a hemp-derived consumer product, an artificially derived cannabinoid, or tetrahydrocannabinols; new text end new text begin (2) driving, operating, or being in physical control of a motor vehicle while the person's body contained any amount of a controlled substance listed in Schedule I or II, or its metabolite, other than marijuana or tetrahydrocannabinols, as demonstrated by a test of the person's breath, blood, or urine performed pursuant to section 169A.51, 169A.52, or 171.177; or new text end new text begin (3) driving, operating, or being in physical control of a motor vehicle: new text end new text begin (i) while under the influence of a controlled substance; new text end new text begin (ii) while under the influence of an intoxicating substance; new text end new text begin (iii) while under the influence of any combination of a controlled substance, an intoxicating substance, and alcohol; new text end new text begin (iv) while the person's body contained any amount of a controlled substance listed in Schedule I or II, or its metabolite; or new text end new text begin (v) while under the influence of cannabis flower, a cannabis product, a lower-potency hemp edible, a hemp-derived consumer product, an artificially derived cannabinoid, or tetrahydrocannabinols as demonstrated by a conviction for violating section 169A.20. new text end Subd. 2. Qualified prior impaired driving incident; determination. Section 169A.09 applies for determining the number of qualified prior impaired driving incidents under this section. Subd. 3. Test refusal; period of license revocation. A revocation by the commissioner as required under section 169A.52, subdivision 3, or 171.177, subdivision 4, must be for the following periods: (1) if the person has no qualified prior impaired driving incidents within the past 20 years, not less than one year; deleted text begin ordeleted text end (2) if the person new text begin committed an alcohol-related violation and new text end has one qualified prior impaired driving incident within the past 20 years, or two or more qualified prior impaired driving incidents, until the commissioner determines that the person used an ignition interlock device in compliance with section 171.306 for the period of time described in subdivision 8deleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ; ornew text end new text begin (3) if the person committed a substance-related violation and has one qualified prior impaired driving incident within the past 20 years, or two or more qualified prior impaired driving incidents, until the commissioner determines that the person completed the testing requirements in compliance with section 171.307 for the period of time described in subdivision 8. new text end Subd. 4. Test failure; period of license revocation. A revocation by the commissioner as required under section 169A.52, subdivision 4, or 171.177, subdivision 5, must be for the following periods: (1) if the person has no qualified prior impaired driving incidents within the past 20 years: (i) not less than 90 days; (ii) not less than 180 days if the person is under 21 years of age and the test results indicate an alcohol concentration of less than twice the legal limit; or (iii) not less than one year if the test results indicate an alcohol concentration of twice the legal limit or more; deleted text begin ordeleted text end (2) if the person new text begin committed an alcohol-related violation and new text end has one qualified prior impaired driving incident within the past 20 years, or two or more qualified prior impaired driving incidents, until the commissioner determines that the person used an ignition interlock device in compliance with section 171.306 for the period of time described in subdivision 8deleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ; ornew text end new text begin (3) if the person committed a substance-related violation and has one qualified prior impaired driving incident within the past 20 years, or two or more qualified prior impaired driving incidents, until the commissioner determines that the person completed the testing requirements in compliance with section 171.307 for the period of time described in subdivision 8. new text end Subd. 5. Driving while impaired conviction or adjudication; period of license revocation. (a) Notwithstanding the periods specified in subdivisions 3 and 4 and except as provided in section 169A.54, subdivision 7, a revocation by the commissioner as required under section 169A.54, subdivision 1, or 171.17, subdivision 1, paragraph (a), clause (3) or (10), for conviction of an offense in another state that would be grounds for revocation in this state under section 169A.54, subdivision 1, must be for the following periods: (1) if the person has no qualified prior impaired driving incidents within the past 20 years: (i) not less than 30 days if the person is convicted of an offense under section 169A.20, subdivision 1 (driving while impaired); (ii) not less than 90 days if the person is convicted of an offense under section 169A.20, subdivision 2 (refusal to submit to chemical test); (iii) not less than 180 days if the person is under 21 years of age and the test results indicate an alcohol concentration of less than twice the legal limit; or (iv) not less than one year if the test results indicate an alcohol concentration of twice the legal limit or more; deleted text begin ordeleted text end (2) if the person new text begin committed an alcohol-related violation and new text end has one qualified prior impaired driving incident within the past 20 years, or two or more qualified prior impaired driving incidents, until the commissioner determines that the person used an ignition interlock device in compliance with section 171.306 for the period of time described in subdivision 8deleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ; ornew text end new text begin (3) if the person committed a substance-related violation and has one qualified prior impaired driving incident within the past 20 years, or two or more qualified prior impaired driving incidents, until the commissioner determines that the person completed the testing requirements in compliance with section 171.307 for the period of time described in subdivision 8. new text end (b) Whenever department records show that the violation involved personal injury or death to any person, at least 90 additional days must be added to the base periods provided in paragraph (a), clause (1), items (i) to (iv). Subd. 6. Criminal vehicular operation or homicide conviction; period of license revocation. new text begin (a) new text end Notwithstanding the periods specified in subdivisions 3 to 5, a revocation by the commissioner under section 171.17, subdivision 1, paragraph (a), clause (2), after the commissioner receives a record of a conviction for a violation of section: (1) 609.2112, subdivision 1, paragraph (a), clause (2), new text begin item (i) or (iv) if one element included alcohol, new text end (3), new text begin or new text end (4)deleted text begin , (5), or (6)deleted text end ; (2) 609.2113, subdivision 1, clause (2), new text begin item (i) or (iv) if one element included alcohol, new text end (3), new text begin or new text end (4)deleted text begin , (5), or (6)deleted text end ; (3) 609.2113, subdivision 2, clause (2), new text begin item (i) or (iv) if one element included alcohol, new text end (3), new text begin or new text end (4)deleted text begin , (5), or (6)deleted text end ; (4) 609.2113, subdivision 3, clause (2), new text begin item (i) or (iv) if one element included alcohol, new text end (3), new text begin or new text end (4)deleted text begin , (5), or (6)deleted text end ; or (5) 609.2114, subdivision 1, paragraph (a), clause (2), new text begin item (i) or (iv) if one element included alcohol, new text end (3), new text begin or new text end (4)deleted text begin , (5), or (6)deleted text end ; or subdivision 2, clause (2), new text begin item (i) or (iv) if one element included alcohol, new text end (3), new text begin or new text end (4), deleted text begin (5), or (6),deleted text end must be until the commissioner determines that the person used an ignition interlock device in compliance with section 171.306 for the period of time described in subdivision 8. new text begin (b) Notwithstanding the periods specified in subdivisions 3 to 5, a revocation by the commissioner under section 171.17, subdivision 1, paragraph (a), clause (2), after the commissioner receives a record of a conviction for a violation of section: new text end new text begin (1) 609.2112, subdivision 1, paragraph (a), clause (2), item (ii), (iii), or (iv), (5), or (6); new text end new text begin (2) 609.2113, subdivision 1, clause (2), item (ii), (iii), or (iv), (5), or (6); new text end new text begin (3) 609.2113, subdivision 2, clause (2), item (ii), (iii), or (iv), (5), or (6); new text end new text begin (4) 609.2113, subdivision 3, clause (2), item (ii), (iii), or (iv), (5), or (6); or new text end new text begin (5) 609.2114, subdivision 1, paragraph (a), clause (2), item (ii), (iii), or (iv), (5), or (6); or subdivision 2, clause (2), item (ii), (iii), or (iv), (5), or (6), new text end new text begin must be until the commissioner determines that the person completed the testing requirements in compliance with section 171.307 for the period of time described in subdivision 8. new text end Subd. 7. Driving while impaired; license cancellation and denial. (a) The commissioner must designate a person with two or more qualified prior impaired driving incidents as inimical to public safety pursuant to section 171.04, subdivision 1, clause (10), if the person is convicted of a violation of section: (1) 169A.20, subdivision 1; (2) 169A.20, subdivision 2; (3) 609.2112, subdivision 1, paragraph (a), clause (2), (3), (4), (5), or (6); (4) 609.2113, subdivision 1, clause (2), (3), (4), (5), or (6); (5) 609.2113, subdivision 2, clause (2), (3), (4), (5), or (6); (6) 609.2113, subdivision 3, clause (2), (3), (4), (5), or (6); (7) 609.2114, subdivision 1, paragraph (a), clause (2), (3), (4), (5), or (6); or (8) 609.2114, subdivision 2, clause (2), (3), (4), (5), or (6). (b) The commissioner must cancel the person's driver's license pursuant to section 171.14 and must not issue the person a driver's license until the person complies with the provisions of this section and establishes rehabilitation according to standards established by the commissioner. Subd. 8. Ignition interlock new text begin and substance use testing program new text end periods; treatment; deleted text begin alcohol-relateddeleted text end new text begin alcohol or substancenew text end violations. (a) Until the commissioner reinstates a person's full driving privileges, the following persons must not operate a motor vehicle, off-road recreational vehicle, or a motorboat unless the person participates in the ignition interlock device programnew text begin , the substance use testing program, or bothnew text end : (1) a person whose license or permit to drive, or nonresident operating privilege, is revoked as described in subdivision 3, 4, or 5, at a time when the person has one qualified prior impaired driving incident within the past 20 years, or two or more qualified prior impaired driving incidents; and (2) a person whose license or permit to drive, or nonresident operating privilege, is revoked as described in subdivision 6deleted text begin , at a time when the person has one qualified prior impaired driving incidentdeleted text end . new text begin (b) A person described in paragraph (a) who commits an alcohol-related violation must participate in the ignition interlock program. A person described in paragraph (a) who commits a substance-related violation must participate in the substance use testing program. A person who commits a violation that qualifies as both an alcohol-related violation and a substance-related violation must participate in both the ignition interlock program and the substance use testing program. new text end deleted text begin (b)deleted text end new text begin (c)new text end The commissioner must not reinstate full driving privileges for a person described in paragraph (a) until the person completes a licensed substance use disorder treatment or rehabilitation program and participates in the ignition interlock device program in compliance with section 171.306 new text begin or the substance use testing program in compliance with section 171.307, as applicable, new text end for a period of not less than: (1) two years if the commissioner revokes the person's license or permit to drive, or nonresident operating privilege as described in: (i) subdivision 3, 4, or 5 when the person has one qualified prior impaired driving incident within the past 20 years; or (ii) subdivision 6 when the violation resulted in bodily harm or substantial bodily harm to another and the person has no qualified prior impaired driving incidents; (2) five years if the commissioner revokes the person's license or permit to drive, or nonresident operating privilege as described in subdivision 6 when the violation resulted in bodily harm or substantial bodily harm to another and the person has one qualified prior impaired driving incident; (3) six years if the commissioner revokes the person's license or permit to drive, or nonresident operating privilege as described in: (i) subdivision 3, 4, or 5 when the person has two qualified prior impaired driving incidents; (ii) subdivision 6 when the violation resulted in great bodily harm to another and the person has no qualified prior impaired driving incidents; or (iii) subdivision 6 when the violation resulted in death to another and the person has no qualified prior impaired driving incidents; (4) eight years if the commissioner revokes the person's license or permit to drive, or nonresident operating privileges described in subdivision 6 when the violation resulted in: (i) great bodily harm to another and the person has one qualified prior impaired driving incident; or (ii) bodily harm or substantial bodily harm to another and the person has two qualified prior impaired driving incidents; (5) ten years if the commissioner revokes the person's license or permit to drive, or nonresident operating privileges described in: (i) subdivision 6 when the violation resulted in great bodily harm to another and the person has two or more qualified prior impaired driving incidents; (ii) subdivision 3, 4, or 5 when the person has three or more qualified prior impaired driving incidents; or (iii) subdivision 6 when the violation resulted in bodily harm or substantial bodily harm to another and the person has three or more qualified prior impaired driving incidents; (6) 15 years if the commissioner revokes the person's license or permit to drive, or nonresident operating privileges as described in subdivision 6 when the violation resulted in death to another and the person has one qualified prior impaired driving incident; or (7) for the remainder of the person's life if the commissioner revokes the person's license or permit to drive, or nonresident operating privileges as described in subdivision 6 when the violation resulted in death to another and the person has two or more qualified prior impaired driving incidents. deleted text begin (c)deleted text end new text begin (d)new text end The commissioner must establish standards allowing a person to submit proof that the person completed a licensed substance use disorder treatment or rehabilitation program. A person seeking reinstatement of full driving privileges must submit proof of completion in the form and manner established by the commissioner. deleted text begin (d)deleted text end new text begin (e)new text end Nothing in this section prohibits the commissioner from extending the period of time that a person must use an ignition interlock device pursuant to section 171.306, subdivision 5new text begin ; participate in the substance use testing program pursuant to section 171.307, subdivision 5; or bothnew text end . deleted text begin (e)deleted text end new text begin (f)new text end If the commissioner learns that a person who is a participant in the ignition interlock device program new text begin or the substance use testing program new text end and who completed a licensed substance use disorder treatment or rehabilitation program subsequentlynew text begin :new text end (1) registers a positive breath alcohol concentration of 0.02 or higher on an ignition interlock devicedeleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin ; (2) submits a test as part of the substance use testing program that is positive for an intoxicating substance or a controlled substance for which the person did not have a valid prescription or in an amount that exceeds therapeutic thresholds; new text end or deleted text begin (2)deleted text end new text begin (3)new text end is convicted of, or adjudicated delinquent for, an offense involving the use of alcohol new text begin or a controlled substance new text end that did not involve driving, operating, or being in physical control of any motor vehicle, the commissioner must extend the time period that the person must use an ignition interlock device until the participant demonstrates abstinence for a period equal to the applicable period under paragraph deleted text begin (b)deleted text end new text begin (c)new text end . A person whose time period is extended under this paragraph must be given credit for one-half of the amount of time that the person participated in the ignition interlock device program before the violation. deleted text begin (f)deleted text end new text begin (g)new text end If a participant in the ignition interlock device program new text begin or the substance use testing program new text end commits an act that results in a license revocation as described in subdivision 3, 4, 5, or 6, the commissioner must terminate the person from the deleted text begin ignition interlock devicedeleted text end new text begin applicablenew text end program. The person may reenter the new text begin applicable new text end program but is not entitled to credit for time spent in the new text begin applicable new text end program before termination. If the person reenters the new text begin applicable new text end program, the commissioner must not reinstate the person's full driving privileges until the person participates in the deleted text begin ignition interlock devicedeleted text end new text begin applicablenew text end program in compliance with section 171.306 new text begin or 171.307 new text end for a period of not less than the longer of: (1) the applicable period under paragraph deleted text begin (b)deleted text end new text begin (c)new text end that applies to the new act; or (2) the full period under paragraph deleted text begin (b)deleted text end new text begin (c)new text end that was previously required to be completed, including any extensions imposed pursuant to section 171.306, subdivision 5new text begin , or 171.307, subdivision 5new text end . Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 171.306, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Definitions. (a) For purposes of this section, the terms in this subdivision have the meanings given. new text begin (b) "Alcohol-related violation" has the meaning given in section 171.178, subdivision 1, paragraph (b). new text end deleted text begin (b)deleted text end new text begin (c)new text end "Ignition interlock device" or "device" means equipment that is designed to measure breath alcohol concentration and to prevent a motor vehicle's ignition from being started by a person whose breath alcohol concentration measures 0.02 or higher on the equipment. deleted text begin (c)deleted text end new text begin (d)new text end "Location tracking capabilities" means the ability of an electronic or wireless device to identify and transmit its geographic location through the operation of the device. deleted text begin (d)deleted text end new text begin (e)new text end "Program participant" means a person who has qualified to take part in the ignition interlock program under this section, and whose driver's license has been: (1) revoked, canceled, or denied deleted text begin underdeleted text end new text begin for an alcohol-related violation pursuant tonew text end section 169A.52; 169A.54; 171.04, subdivision 1, clause (10); 171.17, subdivision 1, paragraph (a), clause (10), for conviction of an offense in another state that would be grounds for revocation in this state under section 169A.54, subdivision 1; or 171.177; or (2) revoked under section 171.17, subdivision 1, paragraph (a), clause (2), or suspended under section 171.187, for a violation of section 609.2112, subdivision 1, paragraph (a), clause (2), item (i) or (iv)new text begin if one element included alcoholnew text end , (3), or (4); 609.2113, subdivision 1, clause (2), item (i) or (iv)new text begin if one element included alcoholnew text end , (3), or (4); subdivision 2, clause (2), item (i) or (iv)new text begin if one element included alcoholnew text end , (3), or (4); or subdivision 3, clause (2), item (i) or (iv)new text begin if one element included alcoholnew text end , (3), or (4); or 609.2114, subdivision 1, paragraph (a), clause (2), item (i) or (iv)new text begin if one element included alcoholnew text end , (3), or (4); or subdivision 2, clause (2), item (i) or (iv)new text begin if one element included alcoholnew text end , (3), or (4), resulting in bodily harm, substantial bodily harm, great bodily harm, or death. deleted text begin (e)deleted text end new text begin (f)new text end "Qualified prior impaired driving incident" has the meaning given in section 169A.03, subdivision 22. new text begin (g) "Substance-related violation" has the meaning given in section 171.178, subdivision 1, paragraph (e). new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 171.306, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Issuance of restricted license. (a) The commissioner deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end issue a class D driver's license, subject to the applicable limitations and restrictions of this section, to a program participant who meets the requirements of this section and the program guidelines. Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the commissioner must not require a program participant to pay the reinstatement fee and surcharge described in section 171.29, subdivision 2, before issuing a restricted license under this section. A program participant is not eligible for full reinstatement of driving privileges until the person pays the full reinstatement fee and surcharge. The commissioner deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end not issue a license unless the program participant has provided satisfactory proof that: (1) a certified ignition interlock device has been installed on the participant's motor vehicle at an installation service center designated by the device's manufacturer; and (2) the participant has insurance coverage on the vehicle equipped with the ignition interlock device. If the participant has previously been convicted of violating section 169.791, 169.793, or 169.797 or the participant's license has previously been suspended, revoked, or canceled under section 169.792 or 169.797, the commissioner deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end require the participant to present an insurance identification card that is certified by the insurance company to be noncancelable for a period not to exceed 12 months. (b) A license issued under authority of this section must contain a restriction prohibiting the program participant from driving, operating, or being in physical control of any motor vehicle not equipped with a functioning ignition interlock device certified by the commissioner. A participant may drive an employer-owned vehicle not equipped with an interlock device while in the normal course and scope of employment duties pursuant to the program guidelines established by the commissioner and with the employer's written consent. (c) A program participant may apply for conditional reinstatement of the driver's license, subject to the ignition interlock restriction, if the program participant's driver's license was: (1) revoked, canceled, or denied deleted text begin underdeleted text end new text begin for an alcohol-related violation pursuant tonew text end section: (i) 169A.52, subdivision 3, paragraph (a), or subdivision 4, paragraph (a); (ii) 169A.54, subdivision 1; (iii) 171.17, subdivision 1, paragraph (a), clause (10), for conviction of an offense in another state that would be grounds for revocation in this state under section 169A.54, subdivision 1; or (iv) 171.177, subdivision 4, paragraph (a), or subdivision 5, paragraph (a); (2) revoked under section 171.17, subdivision 1, paragraph (a), clause (2), for a violation of section: (i) 609.2112, subdivision 1, paragraph (a), clause (2), item (i) or (iv)new text begin if one element included alcoholnew text end , (3), or (4); (ii) 609.2113, subdivision 1, clause (2), item (i) or (iv)new text begin if one element included alcoholnew text end , (3), or (4); subdivision 2, clause (2), item (i) or (iv)new text begin if one element included alcoholnew text end , (3), or (4); or subdivision 3, clause (2), item (i) or (iv)new text begin if one element included alcoholnew text end , (3), or (4); or (iii) 609.2114, subdivision 1, paragraph (a), clause (2), item (i) or (iv)new text begin if one element included alcoholnew text end , (3), or (4); or subdivision 2, clause (2), item (i) or (iv)new text begin if one element included alcoholnew text end , (3), or (4); or (3) suspended under section 171.187, for a violation of section: (i) 609.2112, subdivision 1, paragraph (a), clause (2), item (i) or (iv)new text begin if one element included alcoholnew text end , (3), or (4); (ii) 609.2113, subdivision 1, clause (2), item (i) or (iv)new text begin if one element included alcoholnew text end , (3), or (4); subdivision 2, clause (2), item (i) or (iv)new text begin if one element included alcoholnew text end , (3), or (4); or subdivision 3, clause (2), item (i) or (iv)new text begin if one element included alcoholnew text end , (3), or (4); or (iii) 609.2114, subdivision 1, paragraph (a), clause (2), item (i) or (iv)new text begin if one element included alcoholnew text end , (3), or (4); or subdivision 2, clause (2), item (i) or (iv)new text begin if one element included alcoholnew text end , (3), or (4). (d) As a prerequisite to eligibility for eventual reinstatement of full driving privileges, a participant who either had one qualified prior impaired driving incident within the past 20 years, or two or more qualified prior impaired driving incidents when the person's driver's license was revoked, canceled, or denied under the conditions described in paragraph (c), clause (1), or whose driver's license was revoked or suspended under the conditions described in paragraph (c), clause (2) or (3), and whose chemical use assessment recommended treatment or rehabilitation deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end complete a licensed substance use disorder treatment or rehabilitation program. If the program participant's ignition interlock device subsequently registers a positive breath alcohol concentration of 0.02 or higher, the commissioner deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end extend the time period that the participant must participate in the program until the participant has reached the required abstinence period described in section 171.178, subdivision 8. (e) Notwithstanding any statute or rule to the contrary, the commissioner has authority to determine when a program participant is eligible for restoration of full driving privileges, except that the commissioner deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end not reinstate full driving privileges until the program participant has met all applicable prerequisites for reinstatement under sections 169A.55 and 171.178 and until the program participant's device has registered no positive breath alcohol concentrations of 0.02 or higher during the preceding 90 days. Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 171.306, subdivision 10, is amended to read: Subd. 10. Termination from program; reentry. (a) If a program participant's license is withdrawn for an act or condition that does not involve the use of alcohol during the participant's time on the ignition interlock device program, the person is prohibited from driving, operating, or being in physical control of a motor vehicle. The person can continue to receive credit for time in the ignition interlock device program if the person ensures that the ignition interlock device is serviced and calibrated and the person continues to meet all program requirements. If the person voluntarily withdraws from the ignition interlock device program, the commissioner deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end credit the person with the time spent in the program if the person reenters the program. (b) If a program participant commits an act involving the use of alcohol that results in revocation of the person's license, the commissioner must terminate the person from the ignition interlock device program. The person may reenter the program as described in section 171.178, subdivision 8, paragraph deleted text begin (f)deleted text end new text begin (g)new text end . Sec. 5. new text begin [171.307] RESTRICTED LICENSE SUBSTANCE USE TESTING PROGRAM. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Alcohol-related violation" has the meaning given in section 171.178, subdivision 1, paragraph (b). new text end new text begin (c) "Controlled substance" has the meaning given in section 152.01, subdivision 4. new text end new text begin (d) "Intoxicating substance" has the meaning given in section 169A.03, subdivision 11a. new text end new text begin (e) "Program participant" means a person: new text end new text begin (1) who has qualified to take part in the restricted license substance use testing program under this section; new text end new text begin (2) whose driver's license has been suspended, revoked, canceled, or denied for a substance-related violation or after the commissioner receives a certification of probable cause or a record of conviction indicating that the person violated: new text end new text begin (i) section 609.2112, subdivision 1, paragraph (a), clause (2), item (ii), (iii), or (iv), (5), or (6); new text end new text begin (ii) section 609.2113, subdivision 1, clause (2), item (ii), (iii), or (iv), (5), or (6); new text end new text begin (iii) section 609.2113, subdivision 2, clause (2), item (ii), (iii), or (iv), (5), or (6); new text end new text begin (iv) section 609.2113, subdivision 3, clause (2), item (ii), (iii), or (iv), (5), or (6); or new text end new text begin (v) section 609.2114, subdivision 1, paragraph (a), clause (2), item (ii), (iii), or (iv), (5), or (6); or subdivision 2, clause (2), item (ii), (iii), or (iv), (5), or (6); and new text end new text begin (3) who is required to participate in the restricted license substance use testing program pursuant to section 171.178 or who has voluntarily entered the testing program. new text end new text begin (f) "Qualified prior impaired driving incident" has the meaning given in section 169A.03, subdivision 22. new text end new text begin (g) "Substance-related violation" has the meaning given in section 171.178, subdivision 1, paragraph (e). new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Qualified testing programs; approval. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner must establish performance standards and a process for approving programs or facilities to perform testing to determine if a person has consumed a controlled substance or an intoxicating substance. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner must accept the results of testing performed by a person providing substance use disorder treatment services if those services include random testing to detect the presence of controlled substances or intoxicating substances and the person is either licensed to provide substance use disorder treatment services pursuant to chapter 245G or exempt from the licensing requirements as described in section 245G.02, subdivision 2 or 3. new text end new text begin (c) The commissioner must accept the results of testing performed by, or at the direction of, a person providing community supervision to an individual on probation, supervised release, conditional release, or parole. new text end new text begin (d) Standards adopted by the commissioner under this subdivision must include: new text end new text begin (1) a requirement that, at a minimum, approved testing programs require program participants to contact the program weekly and conduct two random tests per month; new text end new text begin (2) the acceptable form and manner for sending test results to the commissioner; new text end new text begin (3) a requirement that approved testing programs provide services to indigent program participants at a discounted rate according to the standards established by the commissioner; new text end new text begin (4) methods for a person providing community supervision of an individual on probation, supervised release, conditional release, or parole to inform the commissioner if a program participant uses a controlled substance or intoxicating substance; new text end new text begin (5) methods for program participants to inform the commissioner of prescribed medications and enrollment in the medical cannabis program; and new text end new text begin (6) presumptive therapeutic ranges for prescribed medications and medical cannabis. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Program requirements. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner must establish guidelines for participation in the restricted license substance use testing program. A person who seeks to participate in the program must sign a written acknowledgment that the person has received, reviewed, and agreed to abide by the program guidelines. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner must enter a notation on a person's driving record to indicate that the person is a program participant. new text end new text begin (c) A person under the age of 18 years is not eligible to be a program participant. new text end new text begin (d) Program participants must participate in a treatment program and must participate in any treatment recommended in a chemical use assessment report. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Issuance of restricted license; waiting period; preliminary tests. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner must issue a class D driver's license, subject to the applicable limitations and restrictions of this section, to a program participant who meets the requirements of this section and the program guidelines. Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the commissioner must not require a program participant to pay the reinstatement fee and surcharge described in section 171.29, subdivision 2, before issuing a restricted license under this section. A program participant is not eligible for full reinstatement of driving privileges until the person pays the full reinstatement fee and surcharge. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner must not issue a restricted license until at least 90 days have passed since the date on which the commissioner suspended, revoked, canceled, or denied the person's driver's license. A change in the status governing the loss of license does not restart the waiting period unless the commissioner first reinstates the person's license. new text end new text begin (c) The commissioner must not issue a restricted license until a program participant either: new text end new text begin (1) submits the results of four consecutive tests showing that the program participant did not use controlled substances or intoxicating substances; or new text end new text begin (2) if the program participant is on probation, supervised release, conditional release, or parole, submits the results of two consecutive tests showing that the program participant did not use controlled substances or intoxicating substances and a recommendation from a person responsible for providing community supervision to the program participant. new text end new text begin (d) The commissioner must not issue a restricted license unless the program participant has provided satisfactory proof that any vehicle the program participant owns or operates has insurance coverage. If the participant has previously been convicted of violating section 169.791, 169.793, or 169.797 or the program participant's license has previously been suspended, revoked, or canceled under section 169.792 or 169.797, the commissioner must require the participant to present an insurance identification card that is certified by the insurance company to be noncancelable for a period not to exceed 12 months. new text end new text begin (e) Notwithstanding any statute or rule to the contrary, the commissioner has authority to determine when a program participant is eligible for restoration of full driving privileges, except that the commissioner must not reinstate full driving privileges until the program participant has met all applicable prerequisites for reinstatement under sections 169A.55 and 171.178 and until the results of the program participant's testing shows that the program participant did not use controlled substances or intoxicating substances during the preceding 90 days. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Program violations; penalties. new text end new text begin (a) If a program participant tampers with or circumvents a test; violates a condition of a license conditionally reinstated under subdivision 4 or section 171.30; or violates the program guidelines, the commissioner must extend the person's revocation period and the period of time that a person must participate in the restricted license substance use testing program under section 171.178 by: new text end new text begin (1) 180 days for a first violation; new text end new text begin (2) one year for a second violation; or new text end new text begin (3) 545 days for a third and each subsequent violation. new text end new text begin (b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a), the commissioner may terminate participation in the program by any person when, in the commissioner's judgment, termination is necessary to protect the interests of public safety and welfare. In the event of termination, the commissioner must not reduce the applicable revocation period under section 171.178 by the amount of time during which the person possessed a limited or restricted driver's license issued under subdivision 4. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Tampering; penalties. new text end new text begin A person who tampers with or circumvents a test, or assists another to tamper with or circumvent a test, is guilty of a misdemeanor. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Rulemaking. new text end new text begin The commissioner must adopt the performance standards and certification process of subdivision 2 and the program guidelines of subdivision 3 as rules and any other rules necessary to implement this section, subject to chapter 14. new text end new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Choice of vendor. new text end new text begin (a) A judicial officer, county agency, or probation office may not require or suggest that a person participating in the restricted license substance use testing program under this section use a particular provider but may provide the person with a list of all approved providers. new text end new text begin (b) Paragraph (a) does not apply in counties where a contract exists for a specific vendor to provide testing services for program participants who are indigent. new text end new text begin Subd. 9. new text end new text begin Termination from program; reentry. new text end new text begin (a) If a program participant's license is withdrawn for an act or condition that does not involve the use of a controlled substance or an intoxicating substance during the participant's time on the restricted license substance use testing program, the person is prohibited from driving, operating, or being in physical control of a motor vehicle. The person can continue to receive credit for time in the program if the person continues to meet all program requirements. If the person voluntarily withdraws from the restricted license substance use testing program, the commissioner must credit the person with the time spent in the program if the person reenters the program. new text end new text begin (b) If a program participant commits an act involving the use of a controlled substance or an intoxicating substance that results in revocation of the person's license, the commissioner must terminate the person from the restricted license substance use testing program. The person may reenter the program as described in section 171.178, subdivision 8, paragraph (g). new text end Sec. 6. new text begin RESTRICTED LICENSE SUBSTANCE USE TESTING PROGRAM; APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the ....... fund to the commissioner of public safety to establish and operate the restricted license substance use testing program under Minnesota Statutes, section 171.307. new text end